Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462A.2036] COOPERATIVE MANUFACTURED HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Grant program established. new text end new text begin The agency may make grants to counties and cities to provide up to 50 percent of the capital costs of housing infrastructure necessary for an eligible cooperative manufactured housing development project. The agency shall prioritize a grant award after determining that nonstate resources are committed to complete the project. The nonstate contribution may be either cash or in kind. In-kind contributions may include the value of the site, whether the site is prepared before or after the law appropriating money for the grant is enacted. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "housing infrastructure" means publicly owned physical infrastructure necessary to support cooperative manufactured housing development projects, including but not limited to sewers, water supply systems, utility extensions, streets, wastewater treatment systems, stormwater management systems, and facilities for pretreatment of wastewater to remove phosphorus. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligible projects. new text end new text begin Housing infrastructure eligible for a grant under this section shall serve manufactured housing cooperatives as defined in section 273.124, subdivision 3a. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin (a) The agency must develop forms and procedures for soliciting, reviewing, and prioritizing applications for grants under this section. At a minimum, a county or city may include in its application a resolution of the county or city council certifying that the required nonstate match is available. The agency must evaluate complete applications for funding for eligible projects to determine that: new text end new text begin (1) the project is necessary to increase sites available for housing development that will provide adequate housing stock for the current or future workforce; and new text end new text begin (2) the increase in workforce housing will result in substantial public and private capital investment in the county or city in which the project would be located. new text end new text begin (b) The determination of whether to make a grant for a site is within the discretion of the agency, subject to this section. The agency's decisions and application of the criteria are not subject to judicial review, except for abuse of discretion. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Maximum grant amount. new text end new text begin A county or city may receive no more than $60,000 per manufactured housing lot. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Cancellation of grant; return of grant money. new text end new text begin If after five years, the agency determines that a project has not proceeded in a timely manner and is unlikely to be completed, the agency must cancel the grant and require the grantee to return all grant money awarded for that project. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin Grant money returned to the agency is appropriated to the agency to make additional grants under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for grants under the cooperative manufactured housing infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.2036. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end